District of Columbia statutes.
36-122

Unauthorized use or sale of registered bottles.

Whoever shall by himself or his agent fill, use, sell, offer for sale, give, buy, traffic in, or shall have in his possession with intent to fill, use, sell, offer for sale, give, buy, or traffic in any registered milk bottle or bottles, can or cans, crate or crates, or other containers on which appears the name, mark, or device, registered by another person, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be subject to the penalties in this subchapter.

History

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 810, ch. 737, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 48-202.
1973 Ed., § 48-202.